Georgia, session 2025_26, HB663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 12-9-46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to powers and
duties of Board of Natural Resources, designation of commissioner or director as board's
agent, and power and duties of director, by revising paragraph (9) of subsection (a) as
follows:
"(9) To prescribe by rule or regulation fees to be charged by emission inspection stations
for the performance of emission inspections; provided, however, that such fee shall be
no less than $10.00 and no more than $25.00 per inspection and inspections which shall
be based on the cost of performing such inspection in an adequate and proper manner
H. B. 663
- 1 -

LC 39 4655
including, without limitation, the cost of equipment, testing, labor, training, record
keeping, reporting, and other overhead expenses;"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 663
- 2 -